Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 3. Definitions

§ 2-1-301.
Generally.

When used in this code, unless otherwise defined or required by the context, the following words and phrases shall be construed as follows:

“Administrator” means any person appointed by the court to administer an intestate estate;

“Bequeath” includes the word “devise” when used as a verb;

“Bequest” includes the word “devise” when used as a noun;

“Charges” include costs of administration, funeral expenses, cost of monument and federal and state estate taxes;

“Child” includes an adopted child but does not include a grandchild or other more remote descendent;

“Clerk” means clerk of the district court in the county in which the matter is pending and includes the term clerk of the probate court;

“Conservator” means a person appointed by the court to have the custody and control of the property of a ward under the provisions of this code;

“Costs of administration” include court costs, fiduciary’s fees, attorney fees, all appraisers’ fees, premiums on corporate surety bonds, cost of continuation of abstracts of title, recording fees, transfer fees, agents’ fees allowed by order of court, and all other fees and expenses allowed by order of court in connection with the administration of the estate;

“Debts” include liabilities of the decedent which survive, whether arising in contract, tort or otherwise;

“Devise” when used as a noun, means the testamentary disposition of property, both real and personal;

“Devise” when used as a verb, means to dispose of property, both real and personal, by a will;

“Devisee” includes legatee;

“Distributee” means a person entitled to any property of the decedent under his will or under the statutes of intestate succession;

“Estate” means the real and personal property of a decedent, a ward or a trust, as from time to time changed in form by sale, reinvestment or otherwise, and augmented by any accretions, additions or substitutions, or diminished by any decreases and distributions therefrom;

“Executor” means any person appointed by the court to administer the estate of a testate decedent;

“Fiduciary” means a personal representative, executor, administrator, guardian, conservator or trustee;

“Full age” means the state of legal majority having attained the age of eighteen (18) years;

“Guardian” means the person appointed by the court to have custody of the person of the ward under the provisions of this code;

“Guardian of the property” means “conservator” and may be used at the election of the person appointed by the court to have the custody and care of the property of a ward;

“Heir” means any person except the surviving spouse, who is entitled to property of a decedent under the statutes of intestate succession;

“Incompetent” includes any person who has been adjudicated by a court to be incapable of managing his property, or caring for his own person, or both;

“Issue” for the purposes of intestate succession, includes all lawful lineal descendents of a person, whether natural or adopted, except those who are the lineal descendents of his living descendents;

“Legacy” means a testamentary disposition of personal property;

“Legatee” means a person entitled to personal property under a will;

“Letters” include letters testamentary, letters of administration, letters of guardianship, letters of conservatorship and letters of trusteeship;

“Minor” means a person who has not attained the age of eighteen (18) years;

“Person” includes natural persons and corporations;

“Personal representative” includes executor and administrator;

“Property” includes both real and personal property;

“Surviving spouse” means the surviving wife or husband, as the case may be;

“Temporary administrator” means any person appointed by the court to care for an estate pending the probating of a proposed will, or to handle any special matters designated by the court;

“Trustee” means any person appointed as trustee by the instrument creating the trust, or any person appointed by the court to administer the trust;

“Trusts” include only testamentary trusts; express trusts where jurisdiction is specifically conferred on the court by the trust instrument; express trusts where the jurisdiction of the court is invoked by the trustee, beneficiary or any interested party; and trusts which are established by a judgment or a decree of court which results in administration of the trust by the court;

“Will” includes a codicil, a testamentary instrument that merely appoints an executor, or a testamentary instrument that merely revokes or revives another will.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1993, ch. 1, § 1; 2016 ch. 39, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2019 ch. 125, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, inserted “defined or” following “unless otherwise” in (a).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(v), deleted "nor, except as provided in Chapter 4, an illegitimate child."

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this code.” —

The term “this code” seems to mean the Wyoming Probate Code. See §

2-1-101

and notes thereto.

Applicability. —

Laws 2019, ch. 125 § 3, provides: "This act applies to all probate matters filed or commenced on or after the effective date of this act."

Standing.—

Granddaughter lacked standing to apply for a decree of summary distribution of the real property of her grandfather’s estate under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

2-1-205

(2017) where the definition of distributee set forth in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 2-1-301(a)(xiii) applied solely to persons who were entitled to property of a decedent through that decedent’s will or the statutes of intestate succession as applied to that decedent, the grandfather’s will had passed his assets and real property to his wife, and the granddaughter allegedly possessed an interest in the real property by way of several estates. In re Estate of Frank, 2019 WY 4, 432 P.3d 885,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 2019).

Applicability.—

Definition of distributee applies solely to persons who are entitled to property of a decedent through that decedent’s will or the statutes of intestate succession as applied to that decedent. Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 2-1-301(a)(xiii). In re Estate of Frank, 2019 WY 4, 432 P.3d 885,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 2019).

Applied

in

Wetering v. Eisele, 682 P.2d 1055,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 296

(Wyo. 1984); West v. Wyoming State Treas., 822 P.2d 1269,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 1991); In re Estate of Ronald, 2014 WY 129,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Oct. 14, 2014).

Quoted

in

In re Estate of Croft, 713 P.2d 782,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 478

(Wyo. 1986).

Stated

in

In re Estate of Campbell, 673 P.2d 645,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 398

(Wyo. 1983).

Cited

in

Strngari v. Taylor (In re Estate of Novakovich), 2004 WY 158, 101 P.3d 931,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(2004); Halliburton Energy Servs. v. Gunter, 2007 WY 151, 167 P.3d 645,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Sept. 20, 2007).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Word “child” or “children” in will as including grandchild or grandchildren, 30 ALR4th 319.

Wills: what constitutes “bank,” “checking,” or “savings” account, within meaning of bequest, 31 ALR4th 688.

Rights of inheritance as between kindred of whole and half blood, 47 ALR4th 561.

Adopted child as within class named in deed or inter vivos trust instrument, 37 ALR5th 237.